Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1664.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-322, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-322. Number of signatures required on nomination petitions A. Nomination petitions shall be signed by a number of qualified signers equal to: 1. If for a candidate for the office of United States senator or for a state office, excepting members of the legislature and superior court judges, at least one-fourth of one percent but not more than ten percent of the total number of qualified signers in the this state. 2. If for a candidate for the office of representative in Congress, at least one-half of one percent but not more than ten percent of the total number of qualified signers in the district from which the representative shall be elected, except that if for a candidate for a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of representative in Congress, at least one-fourth of one percent but not more than ten percent of the total number of qualified signers in the district from which the representative shall be elected. 3. If for a candidate for the office of member of the legislature, at least one-half of one percent but not more than three percent of the total number of qualified signers in the district from which the member of the legislature may be elected. 4. If for a candidate for a county office or superior court judge, at least one percent but not more than ten percent of the total number of qualified signers in the county or district, except that if for a candidate from a county with a population of two hundred thousand persons or more, at least one-fourth of one percent but not more than ten percent of the total number of qualified signers in the county or district. 5. If for a candidate for a community college district, at least one-quarter of one percent but not more than ten percent of the total voter registration in the precinct as established pursuant to section 15-1441. Notwithstanding the total voter registration in the community college district, the maximum number of signatures required by this paragraph is one thousand. 6. If for a candidate for county precinct committeeman, at least two percent but not more than ten percent of the party voter registration in the precinct or ten signatures, whichever is less. 7. If for a candidate for justice of the peace or constable In a county with a population of one million persons or more: , (a) If for a candidate for Justice of the peace, at least one percent but not more than ten percent of the number of qualified signers in the precinct. (b) If for a candidate For constable, at least one percent of the number of qualified signers in the justice precinct or one thousand signatures, whichever is less, but not more than ten percent of the number of qualified signers in the justice precinct. 8. If for a candidate for justice of the peace or constable in a county with a population of less than one million persons, at least one percent but not more than ten percent of the number of qualified signers in the precinct or three hundred signatures, whichever is less. 9. If for a candidate for mayor or other office nominated by a city at large, at least five percent and not more than ten percent of the designated party vote in the city, except that a city that chooses to hold nonpartisan elections may provide by ordinance that the minimum number of signatures required for the candidate be one thousand signatures or five percent of the vote in the city, whichever is less, but not more than ten percent of the vote in the city. 10. If for an office nominated by ward, precinct or other district of a city, at least five percent and not more than ten percent of the designated party vote in the ward, precinct or other district, except that a city that chooses to hold nonpartisan elections may provide by ordinance that the minimum number of signatures required for the candidate be two hundred fifty signatures or five percent of the vote in the district, whichever is less, but not more than ten percent of the vote in the district. 11. If for a candidate for an office nominated by a town at large, by a number of qualified electors who are qualified to vote for the candidate whose nomination petition they are signing equal to at least five percent and not more than ten percent of the vote in the town, except that a town that chooses to hold nonpartisan elections may provide by ordinance that the minimum number of signatures required for the candidate be one thousand signatures or five percent of the vote in the town, whichever is less, but not more than ten percent of the vote in the town. 12. If for a candidate for a governing board of a school district or a career technical education district, at least one-half of one percent of the total voter registration in the school district or career technical education district if the board members are elected at large or one percent of the total voter registration in the single member district if governing board members are elected from single member districts or one-half of one percent of the total voter registration in the single member district if career technical education district board members are elected from single member districts. Notwithstanding the total voter registration in the school district, career technical education district or single member district of the school district or career technical education district, the maximum number of signatures required by this paragraph is four hundred. 13. If for a candidate for a governing body of a special district as described in title 48, at least one-half of one percent of the vote in the special district but not more than two hundred fifty and not fewer than five signatures. B. The basis of percentage in each instance referred to in subsection A of this section, except in cities, towns and school districts, shall be the number of qualified signers as determined from the voter registration totals as reported pursuant to section 16-168, subsection H on January 2 of the year in which the general election is held. In cities, the basis of percentage shall be the vote of the party for mayor at the last preceding election at which a mayor was elected. In towns, the basis of percentage shall be the highest vote cast for an elected official of the town at the last preceding election at which an official of the town was elected. In school districts or career technical education districts, the basis of percentage shall be the total number of active registered voters in the school district or career technical education district or single member district, whichever applies. The total number of active registered voters for school districts or career technical education districts shall be calculated using the periodic reports prepared by the county recorder pursuant to section 16-168, subsection H. The count that is reported on January 2 of the year in which the general election is held shall be the basis for the calculation of total voter registration for school districts or career technical education districts. C. In primary elections the signature requirement for party nominees, other than nominees of the parties entitled to continued representation pursuant to section 16-804, is at least one-tenth of one percent of the total vote for the winning candidate or candidates for governor or presidential electors at the last general election within the district. Signatures must be obtained from qualified electors who are qualified to vote for the candidate whose nomination petition they are signing. D. If new boundaries for congressional districts or legislative districts are established and effective subsequent to January 2 of the year of a general election and before the first date for filing of nomination petitions, the basis for determining the required number of nomination petition signatures is the number of qualified signers in the elective office or district that was effective on January 2 of the year of a general election. If new boundaries for supervisorial districts, justice precincts or election precincts are adopted after January 2 of the year of a general election and before the last date for filing of nomination petitions for the elective office, district or precinct, the basis for determining the required number of nomination petition signatures is the number of qualified signers in the elective office, district or precinct on the effective date of the new district or precinct. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.